Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1211
Protocol, defined.

Protocol means a set of written policies, procedures, and directions from a physician medical director to an emergency care provider concerning the medical procedures to be performed in specific situations.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 495;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 26.